District of Columbia statutes.
7-531.04

Service credits.

(a)

To initiate the program, the Mayor shall establish a pool of service credits to be awarded to eligible persons who are in need of targeted services. The Mayor may award credits to eligible persons directly from this pool or may distribute all or part of these credits to sponsors who shall in turn be authorized to award them. The awarding of credits to eligible persons shall be commensurate with the availability of volunteers.

(b)

In addition to the pool of service credits established under subsection (a) of this section, a sponsor may, with the prior written approval of the Mayor, establish its own pool of service credits to be awarded to eligible persons. In order to receive this approval, a sponsor shall satisfy the Mayor that it has resources and contingency plans sufficient to meet the obligations imposed by § 7-531.05.

(c)

(1)

Volunteers who provide targeted services shall earn 1 service credit for each hour of targeted services provided.

(2)

If authorized by the Mayor, volunteers may also earn service credits for the completion of pre-service and in-service training and for the performance of administrative tasks in direct support of the program. Service credits earned in this manner shall be computed at a rate of 1 credit for every 2 hours of training or administrative service.

(d)

(1)

A volunteer who has service credits may transfer all or part of those credits, either directly or through a sponsor, to an eligible person. Credits thus transferred may not be retransferred.

(2)

A volunteer who has service credits may transfer all or part of those credits to the Mayor or a sponsor for the purpose of replenishing a pool of service credits established under subsection (a) or (b) of this section.

(e)

Except as otherwise provided by § 7-531.05 or the rules issued by the Mayor under § 7-531.10, an eligible person may at any time exchange service credits that he or she has earned, received by transfer, or been awarded for an equal number of hours of any targeted service. The Mayor or a sponsor shall determine whether a requested service is a targeted service and whether the requestor is an eligible person.

History

Sept. 13, 1986, D.C. Law 6-143, § 5, 33 DCR 4372

Section References

This section is referenced in § 7-531.05.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-2244.